North Carolina statutes. Chapter 164. Concerning the General Statutes of North Carolina.
Article 4. Sentencing Commission.
§ 164-50.
Annual report on implementation of Justice Reinvestment Project. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Judicial Department, through the North Carolina Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission, and the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall jointly conduct ongoing evaluations regarding the implementation of the Justice Reinvestment Act of 2011. The Commission shall present the first evaluation report to the Joint Legislative Correction, Crime Control, and Juvenile Justice Oversight Committee and to the Chairs of the Senate and House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety by April 15, 2012, and future reports shall be made annually by April 15 of each year.

History.

2011-192, s. 8(a); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(qqqqqqqqq).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 164-50

.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws
2011-192, s. 9, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Justice Reinvestment Act of 2011.’ ”

Session Laws
2011-192, s. 10, made this section effective June 23, 2011, and provided that: “Prosecutions for offenses committed before the effective date of this act are not abated or affected by this act, and the statutes that would be applicable but for this act remain applicable to those prosecutions.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction” for “Department of Correction.”

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(qqqqqqqqq), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the section.

§ 164-50.
Annual report on implementation of Justice Reinvestment Project. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Judicial Department, through the North Carolina Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission, and the Division of Prisons shall jointly conduct ongoing evaluations regarding the implementation of the Justice Reinvestment Act of 2011. The Commission shall present the first evaluation report to the Joint Legislative Correction, Crime Control, and Juvenile Justice Oversight Committee and to the Chairs of the Senate and House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety by April 15, 2012, and future reports shall be made annually by April 15 of each year.

History.

2011-192, s. 8(a); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(qqqqqqqqq); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(q).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 164-50

.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws
2011-192, s. 9, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Justice Reinvestment Act of 2011.’ ”

Session Laws
2011-192, s. 10, made this section effective June 23, 2011, and provided that: “Prosecutions for offenses committed before the effective date of this act are not abated or affected by this act, and the statutes that would be applicable but for this act remain applicable to those prosecutions.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(q), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction” for “Department of Correction.”

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(qqqqqqqqq), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(q), substituted “Division of Prisons” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 164-51.
Five-year projection; Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program.

The Judicial Department, through the North Carolina Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission (Commission) and with the assistance of the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Association (Sheriffs’ Association), shall develop projections of available bed space in the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program (Program). The projections shall cover the next five fiscal years beginning with the 2018-2019 fiscal year. All State agencies, the Sheriffs’ Association, and the person having administrative control of a local confinement facility as defined in

G.S. 153A-217(5)

shall furnish to the Commission data related to available bed space as requested to implement this section.

The Commission shall report its projections to the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the chairs of the House Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety no later than February 15, 2019, and annually thereafter.

History.

2018-5, s. 18B.3(a).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2018.’ ”

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 18B.3(b), provides: “The Judicial Department, through the North Carolina Sentencing and Policy Advisory Commission (Commission) and with the assistance of the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Association (Sheriffs’ Association), shall study the feasibility of developing five-year population projections for the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program. The study shall examine potential data needs and existing data, as well as potential projection methods, including making modifications to the existing population simulation model, developing a new model, or using another approach. All State agencies, the Sheriffs’ Association, and the person having administrative control of a local confinement facility as defined in

G.S. 153A-217(5)

shall furnish to the Commission data related to the population as requested to implement this section.

“The Commission shall report the results of the feasibility study to the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the chairs of the House Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety no later than February 15, 2019.”

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 39.8, made this section effective July 1, 2018.